en: Plain goat yogurts
bg: Натурално кисело козе мляко
fr: Yaourts de chèvre nature
hr: Obični kozji jogurti

en: Stirred yogurts
de: cremiger Joghurt
fi: sekoitetut jugurtit
fr: Yaourts brassés, Yaourt brassé
hr: Razmućeni jogurti
nl: Roeryoghurts

en: Plain stirred yogurts
fr: Yaourts brassés nature, Yaourt brassé nature
hr: Obični razmućeni jogurti
nl: Naturel standyoghurts

en: Fruit stirred yogurts
de: Cremiger Früchtejoghurt
fi: Sekoitetut hedelmäjogurtit
fr: Yaourts brassés aux fruits, Yaourt brassé aux fruits
hr: Voćni miješani jogurti
nl: Vruchtenroeryoghurts, Vruchtenroeryoghurt

en: Stirred vanilla yogurt, Stirred vanilla yoghurt, Stirred vanilla yogurt drinks, Stirred vanilla yoghurt drinks
fr: Yaourts brassés à la vanille

en: Sweetened yogurts, sweet yogurts
bg: Подсладени кисели млека
de: Gesüßter Joghurt, süßer Joghurt
es: Yogures endulzados, Yogures azucarados
fi: Makeutetut jogurtit
fr: Yaourts sucrés
hr: Zaslađeni jogurti
it: Yogurt dolcificati
lt: Saldinti jogurtai
nl: Yoghurts met suiker
pt: Iogurtes açucarados

en: Vanilla yogurt, vanilla yogurts
de: Vanillejoghurts
es: Yogures de vainilla
fi: Vaniljajogurtit
fr: Yaourts vanille, Yaourts à la vanille
hr: Jogurt od vanilije
it: Yogurt vaniglia
lt: Vaniliniai jogurtai
nl: Vanilleyoghurts
pl: Jogurty waniliowe, Jogurt waniliowy
pt: Iogurtes de baunilha
ru: Ванильный йогурт

en: Whole milk yogurts, yogurts with whole milks, whole yogurts
bg: Пълномаслено кисело мляко
ca: Iogurts de llet sencera
de: Vollmilchjoghurts
es: Yogures de leche entera
fi: Täysmaitojogurtit
fr: Yaourts entiers, Yaourts au lait entier, Yaourt au lait entier
hr: Punomasni jogurti
it: Yogurt intero
lt: Nenugriebto pieno jogurtai
nl: Volle yoghurts
ru: Йогурты из цельного молока

en: Plain yogurts, Plain yoghurts
bg: Натурално кисело мляко
de: Naturjoghurt
es: Yogures naturales
fi: luonnon jugurtit, luonnonjogurtit
fr: Yaourts natures, Yaourts nature, Yaourt nature, Lait fermenté nature
hr: Obični jogurti
it: Yogurt bianco
nl: Natuurlijke yoghurt, Naturelyoghurts, Yoghurts (natuur)
pl: Jogurty naturalne, Jogurt naturalny
pt: Iogurtes naturales, iogurte naturale
ro: Iaurturi naturale

en: Farmer yoghurts
nl: Boerenyoghurts

en: Bulgarian yogurt
bg: Българско кисело мляко

en: Thermised milk plain yogurts
fr: Yaourts natures au lait thermisé

en: Plain yogurts with UHT milk
fr: Yaourts natures au lait UHT

en: Fat-free yogurts, Fat-free yoghurts
nl: Magere yoghurts

en: Fat-free plain yogurts
nl: Magere yoghurts naturel

en: Desserts
bg: Десерти
ca: Postres
da: Desserter
de: Desserts, Nachtische, Nachspeisen
es: Postres
fi: Jälkiruoat
fr: Desserts
he: קינוחים
hr: deserti, desert
hu: Desszertek
it: Dessert
ja: デザート
lt: Desertai
nl: Desserts, Nagerechten, Toetjes
pl: Desery
pt: Sobremesas
ru: Десерты, Десерт
sv: Efterrätter, Desserter
tr: Tatlılar
zh: 甜品, 甜点

en: Sponge cake with fruit mousse
fr: Bavarois aux fruits, Gâteau à la mousse de fruits sur génoise, Miroir aux fruits

en: Liégeois, chocolate custard topped with whipped cream refrigerated, coffee custard topped with whipped cream refrigerated, caramel custard topped with whipped cream refrigerated, vanilla custard topped with whipped cream refrigerated
xx: Liegeois
fr: Liégeois
hr: Liégeois
nl: Toetjes met roomlaag

en: Chocolate mousse topped with whipped cream refrigerated, Coffee mousse topped with whipped cream refrigerated, Caramel mousse topped with whipped cream refrigerated, Vanilla mousse topped with whipped cream refrigerated
fr: mousses liégoises

en: Goblet of coffee ice cream topped with whipped cream
fr: Coupe glacée au café, Café liégeois